Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-902
Waste of oil and gas; prohibited.

Waste of oil and gas, or either of them, as defined in section 57-903, is prohibited in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1959, c. 262, § 2, p. 901.